Washington statutes.
RCW 39.67.020

Transfer of funds between taxing districts.

Any taxing district other than the state may transfer funds to another taxing district other than the state where the regular property tax levy rate of the second district may affect the regular property tax levy rate of the first district and where such transfer is part of an agreement whereby proration or reduction of property taxes is lessened or avoided. The governing body of every taxing district that could have its tax levy adversely affected by such an agreement shall be notified about the agreement.

[ 1988 c 274 s 3; 1986 c 107 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1988 c 274: See notes following RCW 84.52.010.

Severability—Construction—1986 c 107: See notes following RCW 39.67.010.